Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4601
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-4601 to 71-4620.01 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles.

Laws 1969, c. 557, § 1, p. 2272;

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 127.